Colorado, session 2025B, HB25B-1021.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. Legislative declaration. (1) The general assembly
finds and declares that:
(a) Small retailers are the backbone of Colorado's economy and
a vital part of the communities they serve. From main street shops to
family-run businesses, small retailers provide jobs, sponsor local events,
and keep dollars circulating in Colorado's neighborhoods.
(b) Colorado's retail sector faces a growing burden from
ever-increasing regulations, compliance requirements, and administrative
costs. The vendor fee, allowing retailers to retain a small percentage of
the state sales tax they collect, was created to help offset those costs and
recognize the important role that small businesses play in collecting and
remitting sales tax revenue on behalf of the state.
(c) Current law permits retailers that make less than $1 million per
filing period in taxable sales income to keep 4% of the state sales tax that
they collect, up to $1,000 per filing period. This cap has not kept pace
with rising costs, making it harder for small retailers to absorb the impact
of regulatory changes and inflation.
(d) The general assembly intends to strengthen support to retailers
by increasing the maximum vendor fee retention cap to $2,000 per filing
period. This adjustment will help small retailers remain competitive,
protect local jobs, and sustain the economic vitality of communities
-2- HB25B-1021

across Colorado without increasing taxes.
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 39-26-105, amend
(1)(d)(I)(A); and add (1)(d)(V) as follows:
39-26-105. Vendor liable for tax - definitions - repeal.
(1) (d) (I) (A) For sales made on or after January 1, 2020, except as
provided in subsection (1)(d)(I)(B) of this section, the amount retained by
a retailer to cover the retailer's expense in collecting and remitting tax in
accordance with this section is four percent of the tax reported; except
that, FOR SALES MADE ON OR AFTER JANUARY 1, 2020, BUT BEFORE
JANUARY 1, 2026, a retailer shall not retain more than one thousand
dollars in any filing period, AND FOR SALES MADE ON OR AFTER JANUARY
1, 2026, A RETAILER SHALL NOT RETAIN MORE THAN TWO THOUSAND
DOLLARS IN ANY FILING PERIOD.
(V) (A) ON AND AFTER JANUARY 1, 2026, THE PERCENTAGE OF
SALES TAX REPORTED THAT A RETAILER MAY RETAIN TO COVER THE
RETAILER'S EXPENSE IN COLLECTING AND REMITTING TAX AS SET FORTH IN
SUBSECTION (1)(d)(I)(A) OF THIS SECTION MUST NEVER FALL BELOW TWO
PERCENT OF THE TAX REPORTED.
(B) ON AND AFTER JANUARY 1, 2026, THE MAXIMUM DOLLAR
AMOUNT THAT A RETAILER MAY RETAIN IN ANY FILING PERIOD AS SET
FORTH IN SUBSECTION (1)(d)(I)(A) OF THIS SECTION MUST NEVER FALL
BELOW TWO THOUSAND DOLLARS.
SECTION 3. Act subject to petition - effective date. This act
takes effect at 12:01 a.m. on the day following the expiration of the
ninety-day period after final adjournment of the general assembly; except
that, if a referendum petition is filed pursuant to section 1 (3) of article V
of the state constitution against this act or an item, section, or part of this
-3- HB25B-1021

act within such period, then the act, item, section, or part will not take
effect unless approved by the people at the general election to be held in
November 2026 and, in such case, will take effect on the date of the
official declaration of the vote thereon by the governor.
-4- HB25B-1021